test/src/morphology/V-tooqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tǭ’dõ: # Verb 2 'eng /est tuua/fin' - full paradigm
     tǭ’dõ+V+Inf: tǭ’dõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ger: tǭ’dsõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ger: tǭ’dsõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Sup: tǭ’mõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Sup+Ine: tǭ’mõõs
     tǭ’dõ+V+Sup+Ela: tǭ’mõõst
     tǭ’dõ+V+Sup+Tra: tǭ’mõõks
     tǭ’dõ+V+Sup+Abe: tǭ’mõõt
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tǭ’b
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tǭ’tõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tǭ’bõd
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tǭ’ž
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tǭ’žtõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tǭ’žtõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tǭ’
     tǭ’dõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tǭ’ks
     tǭ’dõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tǭ’
     tǭ’dõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tǭ’
     tǭ’dõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tǭ’gid
     tǭ’dõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tǭ’gõ
     tǭ’dõ+V+QuoSg3: tǭ’ji
     tǭ’dõ+V+ActPrfPrc: tǭ’nd
     tǭ’dõ+V+PssPrfPrc: tǭ’dõd
